Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.015

Alcohol concentration.

"Alcohol concentration" means (1) grams of alcohol per two hundred ten liters of a person's breath, or (2) grams of alcohol per one hundred milliliters of a person's blood.

[ 1995 c 332 s 17; 1994 c 275 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective dates—1995 c 332: See notes following RCW 46.20.308.

Short title—1994 c 275: "This act shall be known as the "1994 Omnibus Drunk Driving Act."" [ 1994 c 275 s 43.]

Effective date—1994 c 275: "This act shall take effect July 1, 1994." [ 1994 c 275 s 46.]